Hawaii statutes.
[§353-63.5] Intermediate sanctions;
eligibility; criteria and conditions. (a) The Hawaii paroling authority
shall implement alternative programs that place, control, supervise, and treat
selected parolees in lieu of incarceration.

(b) The authority may impose participation in
alternative programs as a condition of parole or as an amended condition of
parole.

(c) As used in this section, "alternative
programs" mean programs which, from time to time, are created and funded
by legislative appropriation or federal grant naming the Hawaii paroling
authority or the department of public safety on behalf of the Hawaii paroling
authority as the expending agency and which are intended to provide an
alternative to incarceration. Alternative programs may include:

(1) Home detention, curfew using electronic
monitoring and surveillance, or both;

(2) Intensive supervision, residential supervision,
work-furlough, and structured educational or vocational programs;

(3) Therapeutic residential and nonresidential programs;
and

(4) Similar programs created and designated as
alternative programs by the legislature, the chairperson of the Hawaii paroling
authority, or the director of public safety for parolees who do not pose
significant risks to the community. [L Sp 1995, c 25, §3]

Cross References

For similar provisions, see §§353-10.5 and 706-605.1.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next